Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.390

District budget request—Procedure for approval.

The biennial budget request of each educational service district shall be approved by the respective educational service district board and then forwarded to the superintendent of public instruction for revision and approval as provided in RCW 28A.310.370.

[ 1990 c 33 s 288; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 33; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 21; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 17. Formerly RCW 28A.21.170, 28.19.580.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.